Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.080

Election method—Vote required for annexation—Proposition for assumption of indebtedness—Certification.

On the Monday next succeeding the annexation election, the county canvassing board shall proceed to canvass the returns thereof and shall submit the statement of canvass to the county legislative authority.

The proposition for or against annexation or for or against annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation, as the case may be, shall be deemed approved if a majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast in favor of annexation or in favor of annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation, as the case may be. If a proposition for or against assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the electorate, it shall be deemed approved if a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors of the territory proposed to be annexed voting on such proposition vote in favor thereof, and the number of persons voting on such proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election. If either or both propositions were approved by the electors, the county legislative authority shall enter a finding to that effect on its minutes, a certified copy of which shall be forthwith transmitted to and filed with the clerk of the city to which annexation is proposed, together with a certified abstract of the vote showing the whole number who voted at the election, the number of votes cast for annexation and the number cast against annexation or for annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation and the number cast against annexation and adoption of the proposed zoning regulation, as the case may be, and if a proposition for assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the electorate, the abstract shall include the number of votes cast for assumption of indebtedness and the number of votes cast against assumption of indebtedness, together with a statement of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: See note following RCW 35A.14.015.